Illinois, session 104th, SB414.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hunger-Free Students' Bill of Rights Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 123/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Hunger-Free Students' Bill of Rights Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-1092, eff. 8-26-18.)